Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 2 Child Abuse Records
49-5-46.
Immunity from liability of department, agency, or child advocacy center.

The department, an agency, a child advocacy center, and employees thereof providing access to or disclosure of records or information as authorized by Code Section 49-5-41 shall have no civil liability or criminal responsibility therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1778, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 160, § 4/HB 725.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The department or any agency and employees of either providing access to or disclosure of records or information as authorized by Code Section 49-5-41 shall have no civil or criminal liability therefor.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 160, § 1/HB 725, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Child Abuse Records Protection Act.’ ”